Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Payments to Counties in Which Nuclear Generating Plants are Located

§ 19-9-151.
Distributions to situs counties.

The in-lieu payments made to the State Tax Commission pursuant to Section 27-35-309(3)(b), excluding payments made in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) which are required to be paid into the General Fund of the state, shall be distributed by the State Tax Commission as follows:

For fiscal year 1987, fifty percent (50%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located;

For fiscal year 1988, forty-five percent (45%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located;

For fiscal year 1989, forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located;

For fiscal year 1990, thirty-five (35%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located;

For fiscal year 1991 and thereafter, thirty percent (30%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 507, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1986).

§ 19-9-153.
Distributions to municipalities within situs counties.

Of the funds received pursuant to Section 19-9-151 by a situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located, the board of supervisors of such situs county shall distribute ten percent (10%) of each payment, upon receipt, to the most populous incorporated municipality within the county; however, if such plant is located within a municipality, such payments which would otherwise be made to the situs county pursuant to Section 19-9-151 shall be divided equally between the situs county and situs municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 507, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1986).

§ 19-9-155.
Limitations on expenditure of funds by situs counties.

Of the funds retained by the situs county after the payment made pursuant to Section 19-9-153, not more than Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) per year may be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax, and any funds in excess of such amount shall be expended in accordance with Section 19-9-157.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 507, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1986).

§ 19-9-157.
Payment of excess funds to governing authorities of public school districts; use of funds; borrowing in anticipation of payment.

The board of supervisors of the situs county, upon receipt of the payments pursuant to Section 19-9-151 less the payment made according to Section 19-9-153, shall pay all such funds in excess of Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) to the governing authorities of the public school districts in such county in the proportion that the average daily attendance for the preceding scholastic year of each school district bears to the total average daily attendance of the county for the preceding scholastic year. Such funds may be expended only for the purposes of capital improvements to school facilities and only after plans therefor have been submitted to and approved by the Educational Finance Commission or its successor. The governing authorities of such school districts may borrow money in anticipation of receipt of payments pursuant to this section and the levying authority for the school district may issue negotiable notes therefor, for the purposes set forth herein. Such loan shall be repaid from the payments received under this section by the governing authorities of the public school district. However, no public school districts within the situs county shall be entitled to any payments after January 1, 1990.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 507, § 5; Laws, 1990, ch. 524, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 12, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 26, 1990).